District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.22

Payment for subsistence of prisoners.

There shall be allowed and paid by the Attorney General for the subsistence of prisoners in the custody of any marshal of the United States and the Superintendent of the Washington Asylum and Jail in the District of Columbia such sum as it reasonably and actually costs to subsist them. And it shall be the duty of the Attorney General to prescribe such regulations for the government of the marshals and the Superintendent of the Washington Asylum and Jail in the District of Columbia in relation to their duties under §§ 24-201.12 to 24-201.16 and this section as will enable him to determine the actual and reasonable expenses incurred.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1380, ch. 854, § 1204
Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192
1981 Ed., § 24-421.
1973 Ed., § 24-421.